District of Columbia statutes.
15-385

Repealed

Stay in cases of appeal.

Repealed.

Feb. 10, 1996, D.C. Law 11-84, § 2, 42 DCR 6787
Feb. 24, 2012, D.C. Law 19-86, § 2(c), 58 DCR 11186
1981 Ed., § 15-385.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 6 of the Uniform Foreign Money-Judgments Recognition Act.